Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1414.02
Repealed. Laws 2012, LB817, § 23. Operative date January 1, 2014. State of Nebraska; lease agreement with Grand Island; purpose.

The State of Nebraska on behalf of the Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice shall enter into a lease agreement with the city of Grand Island pursuant to Chapter 72, article 14, providing for the supplying by the city of Grand Island to the State of Nebraska of a Nebraska Law Enforcement Training Center and other services incidental thereto.

Laws 1978, LB 877, § 2.